Louisiana, session 2026, SB443.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart B-51 of Part IV of Chapter 1 of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 33:130.890 through 130.900.2, is hereby enacted to read
Page 1 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
as follows:
SUBPART B. NEW ORLEANS HOSPITALITY AND
ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT
§130.890. Title
The provisions of this Subpart shall hereafter be known as the "New
Orleans Hospitality and Entertainment District Act".
§130.891. New Orleans Hospitality and Entertainment District; creation;
territorial jurisdiction
A. There is hereby created in the city of New Orleans, referred to in this
Subpart as the "city". the New Orleans Hospitality and Entertainment District,
a body politic and corporate of the state, referred to in this Subpart as the
"district". which shall be comprised of all the property within the parish of
Orleans.
B. The district shall be a political subdivision of the state as defined in
Article VI, Section 44 of the Constitution of Louisiana. Pursuant to Article VI,
Sections 19 and 21 of the Constitution of Louisiana, the district is hereby
granted all of the rights, powers, privileges and immunities accorded by law and
the Constitution of Louisiana to political subdivisions of the state, subject to the
limitations provided in this Subpart.
§130.892. Definitions
As used in this Subpart:
(1) "Board" means the board of commissioners of the New Orleans
Hospitality and Entertainment District.
(2) "City" means the City of New Orleans.
(3) "District" means the New Orleans Hospitality and Entertainment
District, created as a body politic and corporate and political subdivision of the
State of Louisiana comprised of all of the territory in the parish of Orleans.
(4) "Hospitality zone" means all territories within the boundaries of
Faubourg Marigny, French Quarter, the Central Business District, the
Page 2 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
Warehouse District, Convention Center District, Louisiana Sports and
Entertainment District, any contiguous area between the boundaries of any of
the foregoing and the Mississippi River and any other contiguous area formally
designated by the mayor of New Orleans as part of the hospitality zone.
(5) "Hotel" means any establishment engaged in the business of
furnishing or providing rooms intended or designed for dwelling, lodging, or
sleeping purposes to transient guests where such establishment consists of ten
or more guest rooms but does not include any hospital, convalescent or nursing
home or sanitarium, or any hotel-like facility operated by or in connection with
a hospital or medical clinic providing rooms exclusively for patients and their
families.
(6) "Mayor" means the mayor of the City of New Orleans.
§130.893. Purpose
The district is created to provide for cooperative economic and
community development among the district, the city, the state, the organizations
listed in Section 130.555(A) of this Subpart and the owners of property in the
hospitality zone, to enhance the development of and improvement to the
properties within the hospitality zone, to promote tourism within the hospitality
zone, to provide enhanced public safety and sanitation within the zone, to
provide for signage and lighting within the hospitality zone, to provide for
property renewal and repair within the zone and to expand the entertainment
and leisure activities and facilities within the hospitality zone.
§130.894. Governance
A. In order to effect the purposes of the district, the district shall be
administered and governed by a board of commissioners, referred to in this
Subpart as the "board". composed of ten members appointed and qualified as
follows:
(1) The chair or holder of equivalent office of each of the Greater New
Orleans Hotel and Lodging Association, Inc.; the New Orleans Chapter of the
Page 3 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
Louisiana Restaurant Association, Inc.; the New Orleans Convention and
Visitors Bureau; the Louisiana Stadium and Exposition District; the New
Orleans Tourism Marketing Corporation; and the Ernest N. Morial New
Orleans Exhibition Hall Authority, or the successor in function of each, as
applicable, who shall serve ex officio and shall have full voting rights on all
matters coming before the board.
(2) Four residents of Orleans Parish appointed by the mayor, all of
whom shall be of the full age of majority and registered voters of Orleans Parish
and none of whom may hold local, municipal, parish, state or federal elective
office or any local, municipal, parish, state or federal nonelective office or
employment, and all of whom shall have substantial business interests related
directly to tourism in the hospitality zone, either as owners or operators of
hotels or other tourism or hospitality businesses. The members so appointed by
the mayor shall serve at the pleasure of the mayor and shall have full voting
rights on all matters coming before the board.
B. The members of the board shall serve without salary or per diem. The
board may reimburse any member for reasonable, actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties pursuant to this
Subpart.
C. The mayor shall appoint from among the ex officio members of the
board a chair of the board to serve for a term of six years and until a successor
is designated. Any vacancy in the office of chair during the original six-year
term shall be filled by the mayor from among the ex officio members of the
board. After the expiration of the original six-year term, the board shall elect
a chair from among its members. The board may elect from among its members
a secretary, treasurer and such other board officers as it deems appropriate.
D. The board shall meet in regular session once each quarter and shall
also meet in special session as often as the chairman of the board convenes the
board or upon the written request of three members. A majority of the
Page 4 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
All such meetings shall be public meetings subject to the provisions of R.S.
42:14. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make them
available for inspection through the board's secretary or secretary-treasurer,
who shall also maintain the minute books and archives of the district. The
monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the official custody of the
board.
E. The domicile of the board shall be established by the board at a
location within the district. The official journal of the district shall be the
official journal of the city.
F. All administrative duties requiring staff assistance to the board shall
be furnished from the personnel of the New Orleans Convention and Visitors
Bureau and New Orleans Tourism Marketing Corporation.
§130.895. Rights and Powers
The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise all
powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for the carrying out
of its objects and purposes, including but not limited to the following in addition
to the other rights and powers set out in this Subpart:
(1) To sue and be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To acquire by gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise all property,
including rights of way; to hold and use any franchise or property, real,
personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, necessary or
desirable for carrying out the objects and purposes of the district.
(4) To enter into contracts for the purchase, lease, acquisition, finance,
construction, and improvement of works and facilities necessary in connection
with the purposes of the district, and to mortgage and otherwise encumber its
properties and enter into leases and other agreements on terms the board
approves.
Page 5 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
(5) To require and issue licenses with respect to its properties and
facilities.
(6) To regulate the imposition of fees and rentals charged by the district
for its facilities and services rendered by it.
(7) To appoint agents and independent contractors, prescribe their
duties, and fix their compensation.
(8) To enter into cooperative endeavor agreements to accomplish the
purposes of the district with any other party, public or private, including but
not limited to the State of Louisiana and its agencies, the City, the Louisiana
Stadium and Exposition District, the Ernest N. Morial New Orleans Exhibition
Hall Authority, the New Orleans Convention and Visitors Bureau, the New
Orleans Tourism Marketing Corporation, and any other recipient of the avails
of a tax imposed on the sale of services as defined in R.S. 47:301(14)(a) or
otherwise on the occupancy of hotel rooms within the district.
(9) Except for the tax authority provided in R.S. 33:9038.39, to exercise
any and all of the other powers granted to an economic development district as
if the district were an economic development district established pursuant to
Part 2 of Chapter 27 of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
including but not limited to the powers of tax increment financing pursuant to
R.S. 33:9038.33 and 9038.34, provided that any such powers exercised by the
district shall be subject to the provisions of Part 2 of Chapter 27 of Title 33 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
§130.896. Applicability of Public Bid Laws
Any purchases or contracts made or entered into by the district shall be
in accordance with the public bid laws of this state; provided, however, that
until the date of the 2013 Super Bowl XLVII, such public bid laws shall not be
applicable to contracts entered into or purchases made by the district and the
district shall endeavor to solicit at least two proposals for all such contracts and
purchases and, whenever possible, to obtain the best price available as known
Page 6 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
to the district, considering the quantities required and the quality desired at the
time available for the delivery, the sources of supply and other commercially
reasonable considerations.
§130.897. Levy of Taxes
A. It is expressly provided that any taxes levied by the district, or any
subdistrict created by the district, may exceed the limitation set forth by Article
VI, Section 29(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana and shall be imposed,
collected and enforced subject to the terms of the resolution imposing the tax
and the provisions of Chapter 2 of Subtitle II of Chapter 47 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
B. The district is hereby authorized and empowered to levy a tax on the
occupancy of hotel rooms in the district in an aggregate amount not to exceed
one and three-quarters percent (1.75%) at any time. The avails any tax so levied
up to one and one half percent (1.50%) shall be dedicated 50 percent to the New
Orleans Tourism Marketing Corporation for the advertising, marketing and
promotion of the hospitality industry in the district and 50 percent to the New
Orleans Convention and Visitors Bureau for sales, marketing, public relations
and promotion of the hospitality industry in the district. The remaining avails
of any tax levied under this Subsection shall be dedicated to the district for use
in furtherance of its purposes.
C. The district is hereby further authorized and empowered to levy a tax
on the sale at retail of food and beverages in the hospitality zone for
consumption on or off the premises in an aggregate amount not to exceed one
fourth of one percent (0.25%) at any time. The avails of any tax so levied shall
be dedicated to the district for use in the furtherance of its purposes.
D. The district is hereby further authorized to levy a tax with respect to
in-premises hotel parking and other fees and assessments on activities within
the hospitality zone that, as a class, benefit directly from tourism or
tourist-related activities; provided that any such tax, fee or assessment shall not
Page 7 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
take effect until forty-five days after its enactment and further provided that the
New Orleans City Council may by the affirmative vote of a majority of its
members taken at any time within 30 days of its enactment, rescind any such
tax, fee or assessment. The avails of any tax, fee or assessment so levied shall be
dedicated to the district for use in the furtherance of its purposes.
E. Any taxes of any type to be levied by the district, district-wide or in
any subdistrict created by the district, with respect to the occupancy of hotel
rooms under authority of Subsection B of this Section or the sale of food and
beverages under authority of Subsection C of this Section shall be levied only
after the board has adopted an appropriate resolution giving notice of its
intention to levy such taxes, which resolution shall include a general description
of the taxes to be levied, and notice of this intention shall be published once a
week for two weeks in the official journal of the district, the first publication to
appear at least fourteen days before the public meeting of the board at which
the board will meet in open and public session to hear any objections to the
proposed taxes. The notice of intent so published shall state the date, time, and
place of the public hearing. Such taxes may be levied only after the board has
called a special election submitting the proposition for the levy of such taxes to
the qualified electors of the district or subdistrict, as applicable, and the
proposition has received the favorable vote of a majority of the electors voting
in the election; however, in the event there are no qualified electors in the
district or subdistrict, as applicable, as certified by the registrar of voters, no
such election shall be required. The powers and rights conferred by this Section
shall be in addition to the powers and rights conferred by any other general or
special law. This Section does and shall be construed to provide a complete and
additional method for the levy of any taxes, subject to the limitations of
Subsection (F). No election, proceeding, notice, or approval shall be required for
the levy of such taxes except as provided herein.
F. Any tax levied under this section shall be in addition to all other taxes
Page 8 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner and pursuant
to the practices and procedures set forth in the Uniform Local Sales Tax Code
in Chapter 2-D of Subtitle II of Title 47 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950.
§130.898. Creation of Subdistricts
The district may create subdistricts as provided in this Section. The
district shall publish notice of its intent to create a subdistrict in the official
journal of the district. At least ten days after publication of such notice in the
official journal of the district, the board shall conduct a public hearing on the
question of creating such subdistrict. Thereafter, the board may designate one
or more areas within the boundaries of the district as a subdistrict of the
district. Each subdistrict shall constitute a political subdivision of the state and
shall be governed by the board. Each subdistrict shall have the same powers
and purposes as the district and shall be given a name and designated as "New
Orleans Hospitality and Entertainment District Subdistrict No. ___" or such
other suitable name as the board may designate.
§130.899. Bonds of the District
A. The district, or any subdistrict created by the district, is hereby
authorized and empowered to issue and sell from time to time bonds, notes,
renewal notes, refunding bonds, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness,
certificates of participation, debentures, warrants, commercial paper, or other
obligations or evidences of indebtedness to provide funds for and to fulfill and
achieve its public purpose or corporate purposes, as set forth in this Subpart,
including but not limited to the payment of all or a portion of the costs of a
project, to provide amounts necessary for any corporate purposes, including
necessary and incidental expenses in connection with the issuance of the
obligations, the payment of principal and interest on the obligations of the
district, the establishment of reserves to secure such obligations, and all other
purposes and expenditures of the district incident to and necessary or
Page 9 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
convenient to carry out its public functions or corporate purposes, and any
credit enhancement for said obligations.
B. Except as may otherwise be provided by the board, all obligations
issued by the district, or any subdistrict created by the district, shall be
negotiable instruments and payable solely from the revenues of the district or
subdistrict, as applicable, as determined by the board, or from any other
sources whatsoever, that may be available to the district or subdistrict, as
applicable, but shall not be secured by the full faith and credit of the state or the
city.
C. Obligations shall be authorized, issued, and sold by a resolution or
resolutions of the board. Such bonds or obligations may be of such series, bear
such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or
rates, including variable, adjustable, or zero interest rates, be payable at such
time or times, be in such denominations and in such form, carry such
registration and exchangeability privileges, be payable at such place or places,
be subject to such terms of redemption, and be entitled to such priorities on the
income, revenue, and receipts of, or available to, the district or subdistrict, as
applicable, as may be provided by the board in the resolution or resolutions
providing for the issuance and sale of the bonds or obligations of the district.
D. The obligations of the district, or any subdistrict created by the
district, shall be signed by such officers of the board by either manual or
facsimile signatures as shall be determined by resolution or resolutions of the
board, and shall have impressed or imprinted thereon the seal of the district, or
a facsimile thereof.
E. Any obligations of the district, or any subdistrict created by the
district, may be validly issued, sold, and delivered, notwithstanding that one or
more of the officers of the board signing such obligations, or whose facsimile
signature or signatures may be on the obligations, shall have ceased to be such
officer of the board at the time such obligations shall actually have been
Page 10 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
delivered.
F. Obligations of the district, or any subdistrict created by the district,
may be sold at such price or prices, at public or private negotiated sale, in such
manner and from time to time as may be determined by the district to be most
beneficial, subject to approval of the State Bond Commission, and the district
may pay all expenses, premiums, fees, or commissions, which it may deem
necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.
G. The board may authorize the establishment of a fund or funds for the
creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, or such
other funds or reserves as the board may approve with respect to the financing
and operation of any project funded with the proceeds of such bonds and as
may be authorized by any bond resolution, trust agreement, indenture of trust
or similar instrument or agreement pursuant to the provisions of which the
issuance of bonds or other obligations of the district or subdistrict may be
authorized.
H. Any cost, obligation, or expense incurred for any of the purposes or
powers of the district specified in this Subpart shall be a part of the project
costs and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of bonds or
other obligations issued by the district or subdistrict.
I. For a period of thirty days from the date of publication of the
resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds hereunder, any persons in interest
shall have the right to contest the legality of the resolution and the legality of the
bond issue for any cause, after which time no one shall have any cause or right
of action to contest the legality of said resolution or of the bonds authorized
thereby for any cause whatsoever. If no suit, action, or proceeding is begun
contesting the validity of the bond issue within the thirty days herein
prescribed, the authority to issue the bonds and to provide for the payment
thereof, and the legality thereof and all of the provisions of the resolution
authorizing the issuance of the bonds shall be conclusively presumed, and no
Page 11 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
court shall have authority to inquire into such matters.
J. Neither the members of the board nor any person executing the bonds
shall be personally liable for the bonds or be subject to any personal liability by
reason of the issuance thereof. However, the limitation of liability provided for
in this Subsection shall not apply to any gross negligence or criminal negligence
on the part of any member of the board or person executing the bonds.
K. All obligations authorized to be issued by the district, or any
subdistrict created by the district, pursuant to the provisions of this Subpart,
together with interest thereof, income therefrom, and gain upon the sale thereof
shall be exempt from all state and local taxes.
L. The state and all public officers, any parish, municipality, or other
subdivision or instrumentality of the state, any political subdivision, any bank,
banker, trust company, savings bank and institution, building and loan
association, savings and loan association, investment company or any person
carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company or
business, insurance association, and any person carrying on an insurance
business, and any executor, administrator, curator, trustee, and other fiduciary,
and any retirement system or pension fund may legally invest any funds
belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations
issued by the district, or any subdistrict created by the district, pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter, and such bonds or other obligations shall be
authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this Subsection
to authorize such persons, firms, corporations, associations, political
subdivisions and officers, or other entities, public or private, to use any funds
owned or controlled by them, including but not limited to sinking, insurance,
investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held
on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations of the
district or subdistrict, and that any such bonds shall be authorized security for
all public deposits. However, nothing contained in this Subsection with regard
Page 12 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-407 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 443
to legal investments or security for public deposits shall be construed as
relieving any such person, firm, corporation, or other entity from any duty of
exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.
§130.900.1. Liberal Construction
This Subpart, being necessary for the welfare of the state, the city-parish
and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.
§130.900.2. Severability
The provisions of this Subpart are severable. It is intended that if any
provision of this Subpart should be adjudged invalid or unenforceable, then
such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity or
unenforceability without invalidating the remaining provisions of this Subpart.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.